California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(History: Repealed (in Sec. 7) and added November 6, 2012, by initiative Proposition 39, Sec. 8.   Section applicable, by subd. (a), for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

25136.1.

(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2013, a qualified taxpayer that apportions its business income under Section 25128.7 shall apply the following provisions:

(1) Notwithstanding Section 25137, qualified
 sales assigned to this state shall be equal to 50 percent of the amount of qualified sales that would be assigned to this state pursuant to Section 25136 but for the application of this section. The remaining 50 percent shall not be assigned to this state.

(2) All other sales shall be assigned pursuant to Section 25136.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Qualified taxpayer” means a member, as defined in paragraph (10) of subdivision (b) of Section 25106.5 of Title 18 of the California Code of Regulations as in effect on the effective date of the act adding this section, of a combined reporting group that is also a qualified group.

(2) “Qualified group” means a combined reporting group, as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section
 25106.5 of Title 18 of the California Code of Regulations, as in effect on the effective date of the act adding this section, that satisfies the following conditions:

(A) Has satisfied the minimum investment requirement for the taxable year.

(B) For the combined reporting group’s taxable year beginning in calendar year 2006, the combined reporting group derived more than 50 percent of its United States network gross business receipts from the operation of one or more cable systems.

(C) For purposes of satisfying the requirements of subparagraph (B), the following rules shall apply:

(i) If a member of the combined reporting group for the taxable year was not a member of the same combined reporting group for the taxable year beginning in calendar year
 2006, the gross business receipts of that nonincluded member shall be included in determining the combined reporting group’s gross business receipts for its taxable year beginning in calendar year 2006 as if the nonincluded member were a member of the combined reporting group for the taxable year beginning in calendar year 2006.

(ii) The gross business receipts shall include the gross business receipts of a qualified partnership, but only to the extent of a member’s interest in the partnership.

(3) “Cable system” and “network” shall have the same meaning as defined in Section 5830 of the Public Utilities Code, as in effect on the effective date of the act adding this section. “Network services” means video, cable, voice, or data services.

(4) “Gross business receipts” means gross receipts as defined in paragraph (2)
 of subdivision (f) of Section 25120 (other than gross receipts from sales or other transactions between or among members of a combined reporting group, limited, if applicable, by Section 25110).

(5) “Minimum investment requirement” means qualified expenditures of not less than two hundred fifty million dollars ($250,000,000) by a combined reporting group during the calendar year that includes the beginning of the taxable year.

(6) “Qualified expenditures” means any combination of expenditures attributable to this state for tangible property, payroll, services, franchise fees, or any intangible property distribution or other rights, paid or incurred by or on behalf of a member of a combined reporting group.

(A) An expenditure for other than tangible property shall be attributable to this state if the member of the
 combined reporting group received the benefit of the purchase or expenditure in this state.

(B) A purchase of or expenditure for tangible property shall be attributable to this state if the property is placed in service in this state.

(C) Qualified expenditures shall include expenditures by a combined reporting group for property or services purchased, used, or rendered by independent contractors in this state.

(D) Qualified expenditures shall also include expenditures by a qualified partnership, but only to the extent of the member’s interest in the partnership.

(7) “Qualified partnership” means a partnership if the partnership’s income and apportionment factors are included in the income and apportionment factors of a member of the combined reporting
 group, but only to the extent of the member’s interest in the partnership.

(8) “Qualified sales” means gross business receipts from the provision of any network services, other than gross business receipts from the sale or rental of customer premises equipment. “Qualified sales” shall include qualified sales by a qualified partnership, but only to the extent of a member’s interest in the partnership.

(c) The rules in this section with respect to qualified sales by a qualified partnership are intended to be consistent with the rules for partnerships under paragraph (3) of subdivision (f) of Section 25137-1 of Title 18 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Added November 6, 2012, by initiative Proposition 39, Sec. 9.   Note: Prop. 39 is titled the California Clean Energy Jobs Act.)
-------------------------------------------

25137.

If the allocation and apportionment provisions of this act do not fairly represent the extent of the taxpayer’s business activity in this state, the taxpayer may petition for or the Franchise Tax Board may require, in respect to all or any part of the taxpayer’s business activity, if reasonable:

(a) Separate accounting;

(b) The exclusion of any one or more of the factors;

(c) The inclusion of one or more additional factors which will fairly represent the taxpayer’s business
 activity in this state; or

(d) The employment of any other method to effectuate an equitable allocation and apportionment of the taxpayer’s income.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, Ch. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

25138.

This act shall be so construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law of those states which enact it. Enactment of Article IV of the Multistate Tax Compact (as set forth in Section 38006 of the code) pertaining to the allocation and apportionment of income shall be construed as a reenactment of Sections 25120 to 25137, inclusive, without any inference that a change in interpretation is implied by such enactment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1381.)
-------------------------------------------

25139.

Sections 25120 to 25139, inclusive, may be cited as the Uniform Division of Income for Tax Purposes Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, Ch. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

25140.

Accounting procedures shall be adopted which will separately reflect the revenues attributable to dividends received by corporations having commercial domiciles in this state.

In view of pending litigation concerning the proper treatment of intercompany dividends, it is not intended by enactment of this act that any inference be drawn from it in such litigation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 167.)
-------------------------------------------

25141.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Entity” means an individual, corporation, association, partnership, limited liability company, estate, trust, or any combination thereof.

(2) “Person” means an individual or corporation.

(3) “Professional athletic team” means any entity which has all of the following
 characteristics:

(A) Employs concurrently during the taxable year five or more persons, who are compensated for being participating members of an athletic team engaging in public contests.

(B) Is a member of a league composed of at least five entities which are engaged in the operation of an athletic team and which are located in this and other states or in other countries.

(C) Has total minimum paid attendance in the aggregate for all contests wherever played during the taxable year of 40,000 persons.

(D) Has minimum gross income in the taxable year of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).

(b) For purposes of this chapter, a team shall be considered to have its operations based in the
 state or country in which the team derives its territorial rights under the rules of the league of which it is a member.

(c) The business income of a professional athletic team derived directly or indirectly from its operations as a professional athletic team shall be allocated to this state pursuant to the following three-factor formula:

(1) Computation of the property factor under Section 25129:

(A) For a team that has its operations based in this state, the average value of all real and tangible personal property, wherever located, and owned or rented and used during the taxable year, shall be deemed to have been owned or rented and used in this state during the taxable year.

(B) For a team that has its operations based outside of this state, the
 average value of all real and tangible personal property, wherever located, and owned or rented and used during the taxable year, shall be deemed to have been owned or rented and used outside this state during the taxable year.

(2) Computation of the payroll factor under Section 25132:

(A) For a team that has its operations based in this state, the total compensation paid everywhere during the taxable year shall be deemed to have been paid in this state during the taxable year.

(B) For a team that has its operations based outside of this state, the total compensation paid everywhere during the taxable year shall be deemed to have been paid outside this state during the taxable year.

(3) Computation of the sales factor under Section 25134:

(A) For a team that has its operations based in this state, the total sales everywhere during the taxable year shall be deemed to have been made in this state during the taxable year.

(B) For a team that has its operations based outside of this state, the total sales everywhere during the taxable year shall be deemed to have been made outside this state during the taxable year.

(d) If any team that has its operations based in this state is required to allocate or apportion a part of its business income derived directly or indirectly from its operations as a professional athletic team to another state or country by the laws, regulations, or requirements of the other state or country and pays an income or franchise tax measured by income thereon as a result of the allocation or apportionment, then all of the following
 shall apply:

(1) The business income of the team otherwise subject to this section shall be reduced for purposes of this section by the amount of the business income which is allocated or apportioned to and taxed by the other state or country.

(2) This section shall not apply to any team in the same league that has its operations based in the other state or country, and the business income of any such team derived directly or indirectly from its operations as a professional athletic team shall be allocated or apportioned to this state in a manner consistent with the method of allocation or apportionment imposed by the other state or country on the business income of the team that has its operations based in this state.

(e) For purposes of the minimum tax imposed under Sections 23151 and 23151.1, an entity which
 operates a professional athletic team shall be treated as a corporation. The liability under Sections 23151 and 23151.1 of any corporation owning any portion or share of an entity shall be satisfied by payment of the minimum tax by that entity, if the corporation is not otherwise doing business in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 226.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 13. CIGARETTE TAX [30001. - 30483.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [30001. - 30019.]

30001.

This part is known and may be cited as the “Cigarette and Tobacco Products Tax Law.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 634, Sec. 1.   Effective September 21, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

30002.

Except where the context otherwise requires, the definitions given in this chapter govern the construction of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1040.)
-------------------------------------------

30003.

“Cigarette” means any roll for smoking, made wholly or in part of tobacco, irrespective of size or shape and irrespective of whether the tobacco is flavored, adulterated or mixed with any other ingredient, where such roll has a wrapper or cover made of paper or any other material, except where such wrapper is wholly or in the greater part made of tobacco and such roll weighs over three pounds per thousand.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1040.)
-------------------------------------------

30005.

“Untaxed cigarette” means any cigarette which has not yet been distributed in such manner as to result in a tax liability under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1040.)
-------------------------------------------

30005.5.

“Untaxed tobacco product” means either of the following:

(a) Any tobacco product that has not yet been distributed in a manner that results in a tax liability under this part.

(b) Any tobacco product that was distributed in a manner that resulted in a tax liability under this part, but that was returned to the distributor after the tax was paid and for which the distributor has either claimed a deduction pursuant to subdivision (c)
 of Section 30123 or 30131.2, or a refund or credit pursuant to Section 30176.2 or Section 30178.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 295, Sec. 1.   Effective October 5, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

30006.

“Sale” includes any transfer of title or possession for a consideration, exchange or barter, in any manner or by any means whatever.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1040.)
-------------------------------------------

30008.

“Distribution” includes:

(a) The sale of untaxed cigarettes or tobacco products in this state.

(b) The use or consumption of untaxed cigarettes or tobacco products in this state.

(c) The placing in this state of untaxed cigarettes or tobacco products in a vending machine or in retail stock for the purpose of selling the cigarettes or tobacco products to consumers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 634, Sec. 3.   Effective September 21, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

30009.

“Use or consumption” includes the exercise of any right or power over cigarettes or tobacco products incident to the ownership thereof, other than the sale of the cigarettes or tobacco products or the keeping or retention thereof by a licensed distributor for the purpose of sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 420, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

30010.

“Person” includes any individual, firm, partnership, joint venture, limited liability company, association, social club, fraternal organization, corporation, estate, trust, business trust, receiver, trustee, syndicate, this state, any county, city and county, municipality, district, or other political subdivision of the state, or any other group or combination acting as a unit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1200, Sec. 70.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

30011.

“Distributor” includes:

(a) Every person who, after 4 o’clock a.m. on July 1, 1959, and within the meaning of the term “distribution” as defined in this chapter, distributes cigarettes.

(b) Every person who, on or after 12:01 a.m. on January 1, 1989, and within the meaning of the term “distribution” as defined in this chapter, distributes tobacco products.

(c) Every person who sells or accepts orders for cigarettes or tobacco products
 which are to be transported from a point outside this state to a consumer within this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 634, Sec. 5.   Effective September 21, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

30012.

“Dealer” includes every person, other than one holding a distributor’s or wholesaler’s license, who engages in this state in the sale of cigarettes or tobacco products.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 634, Sec. 6.   Effective September 21, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

30013.

“In this State” or “in the State” means within the exterior limits of the State of California and includes all territory within these limits owned by or ceded to the United States of America.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1040.)
-------------------------------------------

30014.

(a) “Transporter” means any person transporting into or within this state any of the following:

(1) Cigarettes not contained in packages to which are affixed California cigarette tax stamps or meter impressions.

(2) Tobacco products upon which the
 tobacco products surtax imposed by Article 2 (commencing with Section 30121), Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 30130.50), and Article 3 (commencing with Section 30131) of Chapter 2 has not been paid.

(b) “Transporter” shall not include any of the following:

(1) A licensed distributor.

(2) A common carrier.

(3) A person transporting cigarettes and tobacco products under federal internal revenue bond or customs control that are non-tax paid under Chapter 52 of the Internal Revenue Act of 1954 as amended.

(History: Amended November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 56, Sec. 5.1.)
-------------------------------------------

30015.

“Package” means the indivdual packet, box or other container in which retail sales of cigarettes are normally made or intended to be made. “Package” does not include such containers as cartons, cases, bales or boxes which contain smaller packaging units of cigarettes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 963.)
-------------------------------------------

30016.

“Wholesaler” includes:

(a) Any person, other than a licensed distributor, who engages in this state in making sales for resale of cigarettes that are contained in packages to which are affixed stamps or meter impressions.

(b) Any person, other than a licensed distributor, who engages in this state in making sales for resale of tobacco products on which the tax imposed in Sections 30123 and 30131.2 has been paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 251, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

30017.

“Wholesale cost” means the cost of tobacco products to the distributor prior to any discounts or trade allowances.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 634, Sec. 7.   Effective September 21, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

30018.

(a) “Stamps and meter impressions” means the indicia of payment of tax, as required by Section 30161, and include, but are not limited to, stamps, meter impressions, or any other indicia developed using current technology.

(b) The board shall prescribe and approve the types of stamps and meter impressions, and the methods of applying stamps and meter impressions to packages of cigarettes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1124, Sec. 54.   Effective September 30, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

30019.

“Importer” means any purchaser for resale in the United States of cigarettes or tobacco products manufactured outside of the United States for the purpose of making a first sale or distribution within the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 501, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Imposition of Tax [30101. - 30131.6.]



  ARTICLE 1. Tax on Distributors [30101. - 30111.]

30101.

Every distributor shall pay a tax upon his or her distributions of cigarettes at the rate of one and one-half mills ($0.0015) for the distribution after 4:00 a.m. on July 1, 1959, of each cigarette until 12:01 a.m. on August 1, 1967, at the rate of three and one-half mills ($0.0035) for the distribution of each cigarette on and after August 1, 1967, until 12:01 a.m. on October 1, 1967, at the rate of five mills ($0.005) on and after 12:01 a.m. on October 1, 1967, until 12:01 a.m. on January 1, 1994, and at the rate of six mills ($0.006) on and after 12:01
 a.m. on January 1, 1994.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 146, Sec. 210.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

30101.7.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to facilitate the collection of all applicable state surtaxes, sales or use taxes, and escrow and other payment obligations on cigarettes sold to residents of the state and to ensure compliance with the Prevent All Cigarette Trafficking Act of 2009 (PACT Act; Public Law 111-154).

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (d), no person may engage in a retail sale of cigarettes or tobacco products in California unless the sale is a vendor-assisted, face-to-face sale.

(c) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Cigarette” has the same meaning as provided in Section 375 of Title 15 of the United States Code, as amended from time to time.

(2) “Consumer” means a person who purchases cigarettes or tobacco products. “Consumer” does not include any person licensed under this part or under Division 8.6 (commencing with Section 22970) of the Business and Professions Code and lawfully operating as a manufacturer, distributor, wholesaler, or retailer of cigarettes or tobacco products.

(3) “Delivery sale” means sale of cigarettes or tobacco products into and in this state in either of the following cases:

(A) The consumer submits the order for the sale by means of a telephone
 or other method of voice transmission, the mail, or the Internet or other online service, or the seller is otherwise not in the physical presence of the consumer when the request for
 purchase or order is made.

(B) The cigarettes or tobacco products are delivered to the consumer by common carrier, private delivery service, or other method of remote delivery, or the seller is not in the physical presence of the consumer when the consumer obtains possession of the cigarettes or tobacco products.

(4) “Delivery seller” means a person who makes a delivery sale.

(5) “Face-to-face sale” means a sale in which the purchaser is in the physical presence of the seller or the seller’s employee or agent at the time of the sale. A face-to-face sale does not include a delivery sale.

(6) “Indian country” shall have the same meaning as provided in
 Section 1151 of Title 18 of the United States Code, and includes any other land held by the United States in trust or restricted status for one or more Indian tribes.

(7) “Interstate commerce” means commerce between a state and any place outside the state, commerce between a state and Indian country in the state, or commerce between points in the same state but through a place outside of the state or through any Indian country.

(8) “Tobacco products” shall have the same meaning as otherwise defined under this part with the exception of cigars.

(d) A person may engage in delivery sale of cigarettes or tobacco products to a person in California provided that all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The delivery seller has fully complied with all of the requirements of Chapter 10A (commencing with Section 375) of Title 15 of the United States Code, otherwise known as the Jenkins Act.

(2) The delivery seller obtains and maintains any applicable license under this part and under Division 8.6 (commencing with Section 22970) of the Business and Professions Code, as if the delivery sales occurred entirely within this state.

(3) The delivery seller complies with any applicable state law that imposes escrow or other payment obligations on tobacco product manufacturers, including, but not limited to, Sections 104555 to 104557, inclusive, of the Health and Safety Code.

(4) The delivery seller complies with any applicable state law or local ordinance that imposes restrictions on the retail sale of cigarettes or tobacco products directly to the public from a retail location, including Section 104559.5 of the Health and Safety Code, as if the delivery sales occurred entirely within the state and place.

(5) The Attorney General may require the delivery seller to report to the Attorney General its delivery sales of cigarettes and tobacco products to California consumers in the form and manner specified by the Attorney General.

(e) Any violation of this section by any person is a misdemeanor. Each offense shall be punishable by a fine not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), or imprisonment not to exceed one year in a county jail,
 or both the fine and imprisonment. The amount of any fines assessed shall be deposited in the Cigarette and Tobacco Products Compliance Fund.

(f) The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration may provide information relative to a seller’s failure or attempt to comply with the PACT Act and the Jenkins Act to the Attorney General.

(g) The Attorney General or a city attorney, county counsel, or district attorney may bring a civil action to enforce this section against a person that violates this section and, in addition to any other remedy provided by law, the court shall assess a civil penalty in accordance with the following schedule:

(1) A civil penalty of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and
 not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) for the first violation.

(2) A civil penalty of not less than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) and not more than three thousand five hundred dollars ($3,500) for the second violation within a five-year period.

(3) A civil penalty of not less than four thousand dollars ($4,000) and not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for the third violation within a five-year period.

(4) A civil penalty of not less than five thousand five hundred dollars ($5,500) and not more than six thousand five hundred dollars ($6,500) for a fourth violation within a five-year period.

(5) A civil penalty of up to ten thousand dollars
 ($10,000) for a fifth or subsequent violation within a five-year period.

(h) This section does not prohibit the lawful sale of a tobacco product that occurs by means of a vending machine.

(i) Nothing in this section shall relieve the seller of cigarettes from any other applicable requirement of state law relating to the sale or distribution of cigarettes or tobacco products in this state.

(j) The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration shall enforce the licensing and tax provisions of this section. Other provisions of this section shall be enforced by the Attorney General.

(k) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this
 section or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 462, Sec. 5.   (SB 863)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

30102.

(a) The taxes imposed by this part shall not apply to the sale of cigarettes or tobacco products to either of the following:

(1) United States Army, Air Force, Navy, Marine Corps or Coast Guard exchanges and commissaries and Navy or Coast Guard ships’ stores.

(2) The United States Veterans’ Administration. 

(b) This section shall remain in effect
 only until the first day of the first calendar month commencing more than 60 days after existing federal law is amended by Congress to permit state taxation of sales of cigarettes by or through federal military installations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1336, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

30102.5.

The taxes imposed by this part shall not apply to the distribution of cigarettes or tobacco products that are non-tax-paid under Chapter 52 of the Internal Revenue Act of 1954 as amended, and the cigarettes or tobacco products are under internal revenue bond or customs control.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 634, Sec. 9.   Effective September 21, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

30103.

The taxes imposed by this part shall not apply to the sale of cigarettes or tobacco products by the manufacturer to a licensed distributor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 634, Sec. 10.   Effective September 21, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

30103.5.

(a) The tax and surcharge imposed by this part shall not apply to the sale or transfer of untaxed cigarettes or tobacco products to a law enforcement agency for use in a criminal investigation when that sale or
 transfer is authorized by the board.

(b) A law enforcement agency authorized by the board to receive or purchase cigarettes or tobacco products as provided in subdivision (a) shall not be required to apply for, or obtain, a license as a distributor pursuant to Section 30140.

(c) A law enforcement agency making distributions of cigarettes and tobacco products received or purchased under subdivision (a) is not required to collect or remit the tax or surcharge imposed by this part with respect to those authorized distributions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 941, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

30104.

The taxes imposed by this part shall not apply to the sale of cigarettes or tobacco products by a distributor to a common carrier engaged in interstate or foreign passenger service or to a person authorized to sell cigarettes or tobacco products on the facilities of the carrier. Whenever cigarettes or tobacco products are sold by distributors to common carriers engaged in interstate or foreign
 passenger service for use or sale on facilities of the carriers, or to persons authorized to sell cigarettes or tobacco products on those facilities, the tax imposed under this part shall not be levied with respect to the sales of the cigarettes or tobacco products by the distributors, but a tax is hereby levied upon the carriers or upon the persons authorized to sell cigarettes or tobacco products on the facilities of the carriers, as the case may be, for the privilege of making sales in California at the same rate as set under this part. Those common carriers and authorized persons shall pay the tax imposed by this section and file reports with the board, as provided in Section 30186.

(History: Amended November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 56, Sec. 5.2.)
-------------------------------------------

30105.

The taxes imposed by this part shall not apply to the sale of cigarettes or tobacco products by the original importer to a licensed distributor if the cigarettes or tobacco products are manufactured outside the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 634, Sec. 12.   Effective September 21, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

30105.5.

The taxes imposed by this part shall not apply to the sale or gift of federally tax-free cigarettes or tobacco products when the cigarettes or tobacco products are delivered directly from the manufacturer under Internal Revenue bond to a veterans’ home of the State of California or a hospital or domiciliary facility of the United States Veterans’ Administration for gratuitous issue to veterans receiving hospitalization or domiciliary care. The tax shall not be imposed with respect to the use or consumption of such cigarettes or tobacco products by the institution or by the veteran patients or
 domiciliaries.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 634, Sec. 13.   Effective September 21, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

30106.

The taxes imposed by this part shall not apply to the use or consumption of untaxed cigarettes transported or brought into this state in a single lot or shipment of not more than 400 cigarettes by an individual for his own use or consumption, or of not more than 400 untaxed cigarettes obtained at one time from any of the instrumentalities listed in Section 30102.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 547.)
-------------------------------------------

30107.

The taxes resulting from a distribution of cigarettes or tobacco products within the meaning of subdivision (b) of Section 30008 shall be paid by the user or consumer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 634, Sec. 14.   Effective September 21, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

30108.

(a) Every distributor engaged in business in this state and selling or accepting orders for cigarettes or tobacco products with respect to the sale of which the tax imposed under this part is inapplicable shall, at the time of making the sale or accepting the order or, if the purchaser is not then obligated to pay the tax with respect to his or her distribution of the
 cigarettes or tobacco products, at the time the purchaser becomes so obligated, collect the tax from the purchaser, if the purchaser is other than a licensed distributor, and shall give to the purchaser a receipt therefor in the manner and form prescribed by the board.

(b) Every person engaged in business in this state and making gifts of untaxed cigarettes or tobacco products as samples with respect to which the tax imposed under this part is inapplicable shall, at the time of making the gift or, if the donee is not then obligated to pay the tax with respect to his or her distribution of the cigarettes or tobacco products, at the time the donee becomes so obligated, collect the tax from the donee, if the donee is other than a licensed distributor, and shall give the donee a receipt therefor in the manner and form prescribed by the board. This section shall not apply to those distributions of cigarettes or tobacco products that are exempt from
 tax under Section 30105.5.

(c) “Engaged in business in the state” means and includes any of the following:

(1) Maintaining, occupying, or using, permanently or temporarily, directly or indirectly, or through a subsidiary, or agent, by whatever name called, an office, place of distribution, sales or sample room or place, warehouse or storage place, or other place of business.

(2) Having any representative, agent, salesperson, canvasser or solicitor operating in this state under the authority of the distributor or its subsidiary for the purpose of selling, delivering, or the taking of orders for cigarettes or tobacco products.

(d) The taxes required to be collected by this section constitute debts owed by the distributor, or other person required to
 collect the taxes, to the state.

(History: Amended November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 56, Sec. 5.3.)
-------------------------------------------

30109.

Unless the contrary is established, it shall be presumed that all cigarettes or tobacco products acquired by a distributor are untaxed cigarettes or tobacco products, and that all cigarettes or tobacco products manufactured in this state or transported to this state, and no longer in the possession of the distributor, have been distributed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 634, Sec. 16.   Effective September 21, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

30110.

Any claim for exemption from tax under this part shall be made to the board in such manner as the board shall prescribe.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1040.)
-------------------------------------------

30111.

The taxes imposed by this part are in lieu of all other state, county, municipal, or district taxes on the privilege of distributing cigarettes or tobacco products.

This section does not prohibit the application of Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001), Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200), Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251), or Article 2 (commencing with Section 37021) of Part 17 to the sale, storage, use or other consumption of cigarettes or tobacco products.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 634, Sec. 17.   Effective September 21, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Cigarette and Tobacco Products Surtax [30121. - 30130.]

30121.

For purposes of this article:

(a) “Cigarettes” has the same meaning as in Section 30003, as it read on January 1, 1988.

(b) “Tobacco products” includes, but is not limited to, a product containing, made, or derived from tobacco or nicotine that is intended for human
 consumption, whether smoked, heated, chewed, absorbed, dissolved, inhaled, snorted, sniffed, or ingested by any other means, including, but not limited to, cigars, little cigars, chewing tobacco, pipe tobacco, or snuff, but does not include cigarettes. Tobacco products shall also include electronic cigarettes. Tobacco products shall not include any product that has been approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for sale as a tobacco cessation product or for other therapeutic purposes where that product is marketed and sold solely for such approved use. Tobacco products does not include any food products as that term is defined pursuant to Section 6359.

(c) “Electronic cigarettes” means any device or delivery system sold in combination with nicotine which can be used to deliver to a person nicotine in aerosolized or vaporized form, including, but not limited to, an e-cigarette, e-cigar, e-pipe, vape pen, or e-hookah. Electronic
 cigarettes include any component, part, or accessory of such a device that is used during the operation of the device when sold in combination with any liquid or substance containing nicotine. Electronic cigarettes also include any liquid or substance containing nicotine, whether sold separately or sold in combination with any device that could be used to deliver to a person nicotine in aerosolized or vaporized form. Electronic cigarettes do not include any device not sold in combination with any liquid or substance containing nicotine, or any battery, battery charger, carrying case, or other accessory not used in the operation of the device if sold separately. Electronic cigarettes shall not include any product that has been approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for sale as a tobacco cessation product or for other therapeutic purposes where that product is marketed and sold solely for such approved use. As used in this subdivision, nicotine does not include any food products as that
 term is defined pursuant to Section 6359.

(d) “Fund” means the Cigarette and Tobacco Products Surtax Fund created by Section 30122.

(History: Amended November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 56, Sec. 3.1.   Operative April 1, 2017, by Sec. 10 of Proposition 56.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 1988, by iniative Prop. 99, the Tobacco Tax and Health Protection Act of 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

30122.

(a) The Cigarette and Tobacco Products Surtax Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury. The fund shall consist of all revenues deposited therein pursuant to this article. Moneys in the fund may only be appropriated for the following purposes:

(1) Tobacco-related school and community health education programs.

(2) Tobacco-related disease research.

(3) Medical and hospital care and treatment of patients who cannot afford to pay for those services, and for whom payment will not be made through any private coverage or by any program funded in whole by the federal government.

(4) Programs for fire prevention; environmental conservation; protection, restoration, enhancement, and maintenance of fish, waterfowl, and wildlife habitat areas; and enhancement of state and local park and recreation purposes.

(b) The fund consists of six separate accounts, as follows:
